District of Columbia statutes.
7-1551.31

Minor blood donations.

Provided that the minor meets all the health requirements for blood donation, a minor 16 years of age may donate blood with the written consent of a parent or legal guardian and a minor 17 years of age or more may donate blood without consent of a parent or legal guardian.

History

Mar. 8, 2011, D.C. Law 18-287, § 2, 57 DCR 11495